Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State Forestry Department shall report outcomes from all projects
pursued in this state under  the Good Neighbor Authority Agreement described in section 1,
chapter 96,  Oregon Laws 2018. No later than December 31 of every even-numbered year, the
department shall submit the report, in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, to  an interim
committee of the Legislative Assembly relating to economic development.
SECTION 2. The State Forestry Department shall produce the first  report required by
section 1 of this 2019 Act no later than December 31, 2020.
Passed by House April 18, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2953 (HB 2953-A) Page 1